Tennessee, session 114, SB0852.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-204(f)(2)(A)(iv), is amended by
deleting the language "within ten (10) business days" and substituting "within thirty (30)
business days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0852
002943
- 1 -